src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - O - waabooz :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     waabooz+NA: waabooz
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+waabooz+NA: niwaabooz
     2+waabooz+NA: giwaabooz
     3+waabooz+NA: owaabooz
     X+waabooz+NA: iwaabooz
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     waabooz+NA+Con: waaboozoonh
     waabooz+NA+Dim: waaboozoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     waabooz+NA+Pej: waaboozosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     waabooz+NA+Prt: waaboozoban
     waabooz+NA+Voc+Pl: waaboozodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     waabooz+NA+4: waaboozooan
     waabooz+NA+Loc: waaboozong
     waabooz+NA+Pl: waaboozooag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+waabooz+NA+Con: niwaaboozoonh
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim: niwaaboozoons
     2+waabooz+NA+Con: giwaaboozoonh
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim: giwaaboozoons
     3+waabooz+NA+Con: owaaboozoonh
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim: owaaboozoons
     X+waabooz+NA+Con: iwaaboozoonh
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim: iwaaboozoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos: niwaaboozom
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos: giwaaboozom
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos: owaaboozom
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos: iwaaboozom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej: niwaaboozosh
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej: giwaaboozosh
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej: owaaboozosh
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej: iwaaboozosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl: niwaaboozonaan
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl: giwaaboozonaan
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl: giwaaboozowaa
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4: owaaboozoni
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl: owaaboozowaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Prt: niwaaboozoban
     1+waabooz+NA+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozodig
     2+waabooz+NA+Prt: giwaaboozoban
     2+waabooz+NA+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozodig
     3+waabooz+NA+Prt: owaaboozoban
     3+waabooz+NA+Voc+Pl: owaaboozodig
     X+waabooz+NA+Prt: iwaaboozoban
     X+waabooz+NA+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozodig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+4: niwaaboozooan
     1+waabooz+NA+Loc: niwaaboozong
     1+waabooz+NA+Pl: niwaaboozooag
     2+waabooz+NA+4: giwaaboozooan
     2+waabooz+NA+Loc: giwaaboozong
     2+waabooz+NA+Pl: giwaaboozooag
     3+waabooz+NA+4: owaaboozooan
     3+waabooz+NA+Loc: owaaboozong
     3+waabooz+NA+Pl: owaaboozooag
     X+waabooz+NA+4: iwaaboozooan
     X+waabooz+NA+Loc: iwaaboozong
     X+waabooz+NA+Pl: iwaaboozooag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej: waaboozoonyish
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej: waaboozoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     waabooz+NA+Con+Prt: waaboozoonyiban
     waabooz+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonyidig
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Prt: waaboozoonsiban
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     waabooz+NA+Con+4: waaboozoonyin
     waabooz+NA+Con+Loc: waaboozoonying
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pl: waaboozoonyig
     waabooz+NA+Dim+4: waaboozoonsan
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Loc: waaboozoonsing
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pl: waaboozoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt: waaboozoshiban
     waabooz+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     waabooz+NA+Pej+4: waaboozoshan
     waabooz+NA+Pej+Loc: waaboozoshing
     waabooz+NA+Pej+Pl: waaboozoshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     waabooz+NA+Prt+4: waaboozobaniin
     waabooz+NA+Prt+Loc: waaboozobaniing
     waabooz+NA+Prt+Pl: waaboozobaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos: niwaaboozoonyim
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos: niwaaboozoonsim
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos: giwaaboozoonyim
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos: giwaaboozoonsim
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos: owaaboozoonyim
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos: owaaboozoonsim
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos: iwaaboozoonyim
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos: iwaaboozoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej: niwaaboozoonyish
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej: niwaaboozoonsish
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej: giwaaboozoonyish
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej: giwaaboozoonsish
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej: owaaboozoonyish
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej: owaaboozoonsish
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej: iwaaboozoonyish
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej: iwaaboozoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl: niwaaboozoonyinaan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl: niwaaboozoonsinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl: giwaaboozoonyinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl: giwaaboozoonyiwaa
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl: giwaaboozoonsinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl: giwaaboozoonsiwaa
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4: owaaboozoonyini
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl: owaaboozoonyiwaa
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4: owaaboozoonsini
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl: owaaboozoonsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Prt: niwaaboozoonyiban
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonyidig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Prt: niwaaboozoonsiban
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonsidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Prt: giwaaboozoonyiban
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonyidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Prt: giwaaboozoonsiban
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonsidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Prt: owaaboozoonyiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonyidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Prt: owaaboozoonsiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonsidig
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Prt: iwaaboozoonyiban
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozoonyidig
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Prt: iwaaboozoonsiban
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozoonsidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+4: niwaaboozoonyin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Loc: niwaaboozoonying
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pl: niwaaboozoonyig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+4: niwaaboozoonsan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Loc: niwaaboozoonsing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pl: niwaaboozoonsag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+4: giwaaboozoonyin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Loc: giwaaboozoonying
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pl: giwaaboozoonyig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+4: giwaaboozoonsan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Loc: giwaaboozoonsing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pl: giwaaboozoonsag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+4: owaaboozoonyin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Loc: owaaboozoonying
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pl: owaaboozoonyig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+4: owaaboozoonsan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Loc: owaaboozoonsing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pl: owaaboozoonsag
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+4: iwaaboozoonyin
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Loc: iwaaboozoonying
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pl: iwaaboozoonyig
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+4: iwaaboozoonsan
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Loc: iwaaboozoonsing
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pl: iwaaboozoonsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej: niwaaboozomish
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej: giwaaboozomish
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej: owaaboozomish
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej: iwaaboozomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl: niwaaboozominaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl: giwaaboozominaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl: giwaaboozomiwaa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+4: owaaboozomini
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl: owaaboozomiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt: niwaaboozomiban
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozomidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt: giwaaboozomiban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozomidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt: owaaboozomiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: owaaboozomidig
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt: iwaaboozomiban
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozomidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+4: niwaaboozoman
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Loc: niwaaboozoming
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pl: niwaaboozomag
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+4: giwaaboozoman
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Loc: giwaaboozoming
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pl: giwaaboozomag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+4: owaaboozoman
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Loc: owaaboozoming
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pl: owaaboozomag
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+4: iwaaboozoman
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Loc: iwaaboozoming
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pl: iwaaboozomag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl: niwaaboozoshinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl: giwaaboozoshinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl: giwaaboozoshiwaa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+4: owaaboozoshini
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl: owaaboozoshiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt: niwaaboozoshiban
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoshidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt: giwaaboozoshiban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoshidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt: owaaboozoshiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoshidig
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt: iwaaboozoshiban
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozoshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+4: niwaaboozoshan
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Loc: niwaaboozoshing
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Pl: niwaaboozoshag
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+4: giwaaboozoshan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Loc: giwaaboozoshing
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Pl: giwaaboozoshag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+4: owaaboozoshan
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Loc: owaaboozoshing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Pl: owaaboozoshag
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+4: iwaaboozoshan
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Loc: iwaaboozoshing
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Pl: iwaaboozoshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozonaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozonaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozonaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozonaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozowaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozowaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Prt: owaaboozoniiban
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoniidig
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozowaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozowaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozonaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozonaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozonaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozonaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozonaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozonaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozowaan
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozowaang
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozowaag
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+4: owaaboozoniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Loc: owaaboozoniing
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Pl: owaaboozoniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+4: owaaboozowaan
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozowaang
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozowaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Prt+4: niwaaboozobaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozobaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozobaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Prt+4: giwaaboozobaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozobaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozobaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Prt+4: owaaboozobaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Prt+Loc: owaaboozobaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Prt+Pl: owaaboozobaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Prt+4: iwaaboozobaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozobaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozobaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: waaboozoonyishiban
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonyishidig
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: waaboozoonsishiban
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: waaboozoonsishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+4: waaboozoonyishan
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonyishing
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: waaboozoonyishag
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+4: waaboozoonsishan
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: waaboozoonsishing
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: waaboozoonsishag
     
     
     
